Connecticut, session 2026, HB05506.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (10) of section 31-51kk of the 2026 supplement
to the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(10) "Municipality" [has the same meaning as provided in section 7-
245] means any metropolitan district, town, consolidated town and city,
consolidated town and borough, city, borough, village, fire and sewer
district, sewer district, transit district and each municipal organization
having authority to levy and collect taxes;
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-51kk(10)
LCO No. 2469 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 5506